Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 3. Public Records and Meetings

§ 16-12-301.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Special District Public Records and Meetings Act.”

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-302.
Applicability; filing requirements.

This article specifies requirements pertaining to public records and meetings of the entities listed in W.S. 16-12-202(a) where the principal act is silent or unclear. The specific provisions of a principal act or the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, are effective and controlling to the extent they conflict with this article.

If an entity is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations or adopt ordinances or bylaws, the entity shall file any rules and regulations it promulgates, ordinances or bylaws it adopts and any amendments thereto with the county clerk for each county in which it is located. No rule, regulation, ordinance or bylaw shall be effective unless filed in accordance with this subsection.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

Construction.—

By the Special District Public Records and Meetings Act, the legislature included airport joint powers boards alongside special districts, treated them equally, and declared the Wyoming Public Records Act (WPRA) controlling; this is a clear expression of the legislature’s understanding and intention that all the entities subject to the Special District Act are likewise subject to the WPRA’s disclosure requirements. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 16-12-303.
Maintaining public records.

All special districts and other specified entities shall maintain a copy of the following documents, if the documents exist, provided that the Wyoming Public Records Act and all applicable federal statutes shall control the obligations of disclosure of those documents: adopted minutes of all meetings of the governing board and the governing board’s committees and subcommittees, records of meetings of the governing board and the governing board’s committees and subcommittees, audits, financial statements, election results, budgets, bylaws, rate schedules, policies and employment contracts with all administrators. When consistent with the requirements of this section, all special districts or other specified entities shall produce an original document upon request.

All special districts and other specified entities shall maintain the records described in subsection (a) of this section for public review at their business office if the business office is open to the public for at least twenty (20) business hours each week.

If a special district or other specified entity cannot maintain the records described in subsection (a) of this section as required under subsection (b) of this section, the special district or other specified entity shall file copies of those records with the county clerk in the county wherein the largest portion of the district or entity lies. The documents may be in an electronic format unless otherwise specified by the county clerk. The county clerk may specify the format for records filed pursuant to this subsection.

All special districts or other specified entities shall provide by September 30 each year to the county clerk in every county wherein the entity exists a filing specifying where documents required under subsection (a) of this section are maintained for public review.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

Construction.—

Special District Public Records and Meetings Act requires that certain documents be readily accessible for public review and providing options for ensuring that review is possible; the Act does not establish or limit the covered entities’ record retention requirements or disclosure requirements, and it is not a substitute for and does not change the applicability of the Wyoming Public Records Act. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

While the Special District Public Records and Meetings Act does contain a list of specific documents, what it requires with respect to those documents is that a copy be maintained, and it further directs where and how those copies are to be made available for public review; this amounts to a recognition that certain documents should be readily available for public review, and an acknowledgement that some of the covered entities may not be situated and staffed in a manner to accommodate the required review. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 16-12-304.
Public meetings.

In addition to the requirements of W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

, all public meetings of special districts and specified entities shall be held in a location accessible to the general public or made accessible to the public for purposes of the meeting.

Notice of any meeting of a special district or specified entity shall be made in compliance with W.S.

16-4-404

.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.